Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 10
OFFICIAL GARDENS AND NATURE CENTERS

Cross references.

- Department of Industry, Trade, and Tourism, T. 50, C. 7.

Editor's notes.

- Former Code Sections 12-3-630 through 12-3-641, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1007,

§

1, were automatically repealed upon the defeat of the proposed enabling constitutional amendment at the 1998 general election.

12-3-640. Designation.

In recognition of the many beautiful and outstanding gardens and nature centers of the State of Georgia, the following gardens and nature centers and such others as may hereafter be designated by resolution of the General Assembly are designated as the official gardens and nature centers of Georgia: Atlanta Botanical Gardens in Fulton County, Barnsley Garden in Bartow County, Bullock Hall in Fulton County, Brumby Hall and Gardens in Cobb County, Callaway Gardens in Harris County, Chateau Elan in Barrow County, Chattahoochee Nature Center in Fulton County, Fernbank Forest in DeKalb County, Governor's Mansion in Fulton County, Lanier Museum of Natural History in Gwinnett County, Massee Lane Gardens of the American Camellia Society in Peach County, Rock City Gardens in Walker County, Rosalyn Carter Rose Garden at the Carter Center in Fulton County, Stone Mountain Park in Gwinnett and DeKalb counties, Vines Botanical Gardens in Gwinnett County, William H. Reynolds Memorial Nature Reserve in Clayton County, Thomasville Rose Garden in Thomasville, Birdsong Nature Center in Thomasville, Providence Canyon State Conservation Park in Lumpkin, Florence Marina State Park in Omaha, Oxbow Meadows Environmental Learning Center in Columbus, Columbus Riverwalk in Columbus, Founder's Park in Columbus, Columbus Museum Gardens in Columbus, LaGrange Square in LaGrange, Oak Grove Plantation and Gardens in Newnan, Pine Mountain Trail and FDR State Park nature trail in Pine Mountain, Grandmother's Garden and Pathways of Gold Park in Sharpsburg, Sprewell Bluff State Park in Thomaston, Georgia Veterans Memorial State Park in Cordele, Chatham County Garden Center and Botanical Gardens in Savannah, Bamboo Farm & Coastal Gardens in Savannah, LeConte Woodmanston National Historic Place in Midway, Athens-Area Gardens in Athens, Athens Welcome Center Garden in Athens, Founder's Memorial Garden in Athens, State Botanical Garden of Georgia in Athens, Fred Hamilton Rhododendron Garden in Hiawassee, Cecil B. Day Butterfly Center in Harris County, and Elachee Nature Science Center in Gainesville. The Department of Economic Development and other public agencies and leaders in this state are encouraged to work together to maximize advertising and other programs which will permit the citizens of this state and other states and nations to learn of the beautiful gardens and nature centers of Georgia.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-640

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 945, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 8.)